New York, session 2025-2026, A11397.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 722-c of the county law, as amended by section 2 of 2 part GG of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 § 722-c. Services other than counsel. Upon a finding in an ex parte 5 proceeding that investigative, expert or other services are necessary 6 and that the defendant or other person described in section two hundred 7 forty-nine or section two hundred sixty-two of the family court act, 8 article six-C of the correction law [or], section four hundred seven of 9 the surrogate's court procedure act or article eighty-one of the mental 10 hygiene law, is financially unable to obtain them, the court shall 11 authorize counsel, whether or not assigned in accordance with a plan, to 12 obtain the services on behalf of the defendant or such other person or, 13 pursuant to section 81.09 or subdivisions (c) and (d) of section 81.32 14 of the mental hygiene law, appoint an eligible individual to carry out 15 the duties of a court evaluator or court examiner. The court upon a 16 finding that timely procurement of necessary services could not await 17 prior authorization may authorize the services nunc pro tunc. The court 18 shall determine reasonable compensation for the services and direct 19 payment to the person who rendered them or to the person entitled to 20 reimbursement. Only in extraordinary circumstances may the court provide 21 for compensation in excess of three thousand dollars per investigative, 22 expert or other service provider. 23 Each claim for compensation shall be supported by a sworn statement 24 specifying the time expended, services rendered, expenses incurred and 25 reimbursement or compensation applied for or received in the same case 26 from any other source. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 28 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09838-02-5